Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.250

Student data at authorized entities—Annual report.

(1) Beginning December 1, 2023, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually submit a report to the education committees of the legislature regarding placements of students with disabilities at authorized entities under RCW 28A.155.060. A summary of the report, including a link to the full report content, must also be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website. The report must include:

(a) The academic progress of students receiving special education services from authorized entities, using the results of the two most recent state assessments;

(b) The graduation rates of students who have received special education services from authorized entities;

(c) The rate at which students receiving special education services from authorized entities return to their resident school districts;

(d) Data on student restraint and isolation incidents, discipline, and attendance at authorized entities; and

(e) Any corrective action or change in an entity's authorization status, as ordered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The data published under subsection (1) of this section must be disaggregated by each authorized entity when it is possible to do so without disclosing, directly or indirectly, a student's personally identifiable information as protected under the federal family educational rights and privacy act (Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(3) As used in this section, "authorized entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.300.690.

[ 2023 c 436 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 436: See note following RCW 28A.300.690.